South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 31 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 31-3-60. (A) Personal property belonging to a tenant removed from a public housing unit as a result of an eviction proceeding must be stored for no less than six months after the date of the eviction at the expense of the public housing authority. If the tenant fails to collect the property after six months, the authority may dispose of the property. The provisions of Section 27-40-710(D) do not apply to the removal of personal property from a public housing unit. (B) A public housing authority who delivers written notice regarding the termination of the rental agreement pursuant to Section 27-40-710(A) must also deliver written notice that any personal property left by the tenant will be stored for no less than six months by the public housing authority and provide the name and location of the storage facility for the tenant to collect the property. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----